Utah statutes.
64-13-2.   Creation of department.

There is created a Department of Corrections, under the general supervision of the executive director of the department.  The department is the state authority for corrections and assumes all powers and responsibilities formerly vested in the Board of Corrections and the Division of Corrections in the Department of Human Services.



Amended by Chapter 183, 1990 General Session

